Illinois, session 104th, HB2215.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Early Mental Health and Addictions 5Treatment Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 65/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Early 8Mental Health and Addictions Treatment Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-1016, eff. 8-21-18.)